District of Columbia statutes.
42-2705.01

Agency actions governed by Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of § 42-2704.02, all actions of the Agency shall be conducted in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.).

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 501, 25 DCR 5008
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(t), 28 DCR 2848

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2151.
1973 Ed., § 45-1927.